Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1278.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 630.1, 910, 911, 916, 951(e), 976, 981.1, 1802.1 and 1813 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 read:Section 630.1. [Affidavits] Statement of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, school district or poor district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as provided in section 630 of this act, shall file with the nomination certificate [an affidavit] a statement, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities), stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school board in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (g) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the [affidavit] statement.Section 910. [Affidavits] Statement of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated 20250HB1278PN1433 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 town, township, ward, school district, poor district, election district, party office, party delegate or alternate, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, shall file with his nomination petition his [affidavit] statement, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities), stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting nomination and election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school director in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace that he is not a candidate for nomination for the same office of any party other than the one designated in such petition; (g) if he is a candidate for a delegate, or alternate delegate, member of State committee, National committee or party officer, that he is a registered and enrolled member of the designated party; (h) if he is a candidate for delegate or alternate delegate the presidential candidate to whom he is committed or the term "uncommitted"; (i) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring pre-election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (j) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the [affidavit] statement. In cases of 20250HB1278PN1433 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petitions for delegate and alternate delegate to National conventions, the candidate's [affidavit] statement shall state that his signature to the delegate's statement, as hereinafter set forth, if such statement is signed by said candidate, was affixed to the sheet or sheets of said petition prior to the circulation of same. In the case of a candidate for nomination as President of the United States, it shall not be necessary for such candidate to file the [affidavit] statement required in this section to be filed by candidates, but the post-office address of such candidate shall be stated in such nomination petition.Section 911. Statement of Candidates for Delegates to National Conventions.--Each candidate for election as delegate or alternate delegate to a National party convention may include, with [his affidavit] the statement required under section 910, the statement hereinafter set forth in this section; but his failure to include such statement shall not be a valid ground, on the part of the Secretary of the Commonwealth, for refusal to receive and file his nomination petition. Such statement, if signed, shall be signed on all the sheets of said petition, together with the date of signing and shall be in substantially the following form:Delegate's StatementI hereby declare to the voters of my political party in the (here insert "State of Pennsylvania," if a delegate or alternate delegate at large; otherwise, insert "..........District") that, if elected and in attendance as a delegate to the National convention of the party, I shall, with all fidelity, to the best of my judgment and ability, in all matters coming before the convention, support (here insert name of presidential candidate) 20250HB1278PN1433 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for President of the United States and shall use all honorable means within my power to aid in securing the nomination for such candidate for President.................................................................(Signature of candidate for delegate or alternate delegate, and date of signing.)On the ballots or ballot labels used at a primary, after or under the name of each candidate for delegate or alternate delegate to a National party convention, shall appear the words "committed to (here insert name of presidential candidate)" or "uncommitted" according to whether the candidate included, or failed to include, the above statement with [his affidavit] the statement required under section 910.Section 916. Secretary of the Commonwealth to Furnish County Boards with List of Candidates; Candidates to Be Notified.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth, as soon as possible after the last day fixed for the filing of nomination petitions with him, and after the last day for the withdrawal of candidates filing such nomination petitions, and after the candidates shall have cast lots for the position of their names upon the primary ballots or ballot labels, shall forward to the county board of each county a correct list of candidates of each party for the various offices, in the order in which they are to appear upon the official ballots or ballot labels, with their respective residences, giving city, borough, town or township, and post-office addresses as shown in their [affidavits] statements; and shall also at the same time notify the said candidates by mail that their names have been so certified to said county boards. In the case of each candidate for delegate or alternate delegate to a National party convention, the Secretary of the 20250HB1278PN1433 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth shall certify as to whether such candidate has included with his [affidavit] statement the statement provided for in section 911 of this act and in cases where such candidate has committed himself to a particular presidential preference, the name of the presidential candidate to whom he is committed.Section 951. Nominations by Political Bodies.--* * *(e) There shall be appended to each nomination paper offered for filing [an affidavit] a statement, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904, of each candidate nominated therein, stating--(1) the election district in which he resides; (2) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (3) that he is eligible for such office; (4) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses, and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (5) that his name has not been presented as a candidate by nomination petitions for any public office to be voted for at the ensuing primary election, nor has he been nominated by any other nomination papers filed for any such office; (6) that in the case where he is a candidate for election at a general or municipal election, he was not a registered and enrolled member of a party thirty (30) days before the primary held prior to the general or municipal election in that same year; (7) that, in the case where he is a candidate for election at a special election, he is not a registered and enrolled member of a party; and (8) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the [affidavit] statement.Section 976. Examination of Nomination Petitions, Certificates and Papers; Return of Rejected Nomination 20250HB1278PN1433 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Petitions, Certificates and Papers.--When any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper is presented in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth or of any county board of elections for filing within the period limited by this act, it shall be the duty of the said officer or board to examine the same. No nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed if--(a) it contains material errors or defects apparent on the face thereof, or on the face of the appended or accompanying [affidavits] statements; or (b) it contains material alterations made after signing without the consent of the signers; or (c) it does not contain a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; Provided, however, That the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, although not hereby required so to do, may question the genuineness of any signature or signatures appearing thereon, and if he or it shall thereupon find that any such signature or signatures are not genuine, such signature or signatures shall be disregarded in determining whether the nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; or (d) in the case of nomination petitions, if nomination petitions have been filed for printing the name of the same person for the same office, except the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or the office of school director in districts where that office is elective or the office of justice of the peace upon the official ballot of more than one political party; or (e) in the case of nomination papers, if the candidate named therein has filed a nomination petition for any public office for the ensuing primary, or has been nominated for any such 20250HB1278PN1433 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 office by nomination papers previously filed; or (f) if the nomination petitions or papers are not accompanied by the filing fee or certified check required for said office; or (g) in the case of nomination papers, the appellation set forth therein is identical with or deceptively similar to the words used by any existing party or by any political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office, or if the appellation set forth therein contains part of the name, or an abbreviation of the name or part of the name of an existing political party, or of a political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office. The invalidity of any sheet of a nomination petition or nomination paper shall not affect the validity of such petition or paper if a sufficient petition or paper remains after eliminating such invalid sheet. The action of said officer or board in refusing to receive and file any such nomination petition, certificate or paper, may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when it was presented to the office of such officer or board: Provided, however, That said officer or board shall be entitled to a reasonable time in which to examine any petitions, certificates or papers, and to summon and interrogate the candidates named therein, or the persons presenting said petitions, certificates or papers, and his or their retention of same for the purpose of making such examination or interrogation shall not be construed as an acceptance or filing.Upon completion of any examination, if any nomination petition, certificate or paper is found to be defective, it shall forthwith be rejected and returned to the candidate or one of the candidates named therein, together with a statement of the reasons for such rejection:20250HB1278PN1433 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Provided further, That no nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed, if the political party or political body referred to therein shall be composed of a group of electors whose purposes or aims, or one of whose purposes or aims, is the establishment, control, conduct, seizure or overthrow of the Government of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or the United States of America by the use of force, violence, military measure or threats of one or more of the foregoing. The authority to reject such nomination petition, paper or certificate for this reason shall, when filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, be vested in a committee composed of the Governor, the Attorney General and the Secretary of the Commonwealth, and when filed with any county board of elections shall be vested in such board. If in such case the committee or board, as the case may be, shall conclude that the acceptance of such nomination petition, paper or certificate should be refused, it shall within two days of the filing of such nomination petition, paper or certificate fix a place and a time five days in advance for hearing the matter, and notice thereof shall be given to all parties affected thereby. At the time and place so fixed the committee or board, as the case may be, shall hear testimony, but shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The testimony presented shall be stenographically recorded and made a part of the record of the committee or board. Within two days after such hearing the committee or board, if satisfied upon competent evidence that the said nomination petition, paper or certificate is not entitled to be accepted and filed, it shall announce its decision and immediately notify the parties affected thereby. Failure to announce decision within two days after such hearing 20250HB1278PN1433 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be conclusive that such nomination petition, paper or certificate has been accepted and filed. The decision of said committee or board in refusing to accept and file such nomination petition, paper or certificate may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when presented to the Secretary of the Commonwealth or such board. The application shall be made within two days of the time when such decision is announced. If the application is properly made, any judge of said court may fix a time and place for hearing the matter in dispute, of which notice shall be served with a copy of said application upon the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, as the case may be. At the time so fixed, the court, or any judge thereof assigned for the purpose, shall hear the case de novo. If after such hearing the said court shall find that the decision of the committee or the board was erroneous, it shall issue its mandate to the committee or board to correct its decision and to accept and file the nomination paper, petition or certificate. From any decision of the court an appeal may be taken within two days after the entry thereof. It shall be the duty of the said court to fix the hearing and to announce its decision within such period of time as will permit the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections to permit the names of the candidates affected by the court's decision to be printed on the ballot, if the court should so determine.Section 981.1. [Affidavits] Statement of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, ward, school district, poor district or election district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as provided in sections 979 20250HB1278PN1433 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and 980 of this act, shall file with the substituted nomination certificate [an affidavit] a statement, subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities), stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school board in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (g) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the [affidavit] statement.Section 1802.1. False [Affidavits] Statements of Candidates.--Any candidate for State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or school district office or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress or any other elective public office who knowingly makes a false statement regarding his eligibility or qualifications for such office in his candidate's [affidavit] statement shall, in litigation which results in the removal of the candidate from 20250HB1278PN1433 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the ballot, be liable for court costs, including filing fees, attorney fees, investigation fees and similar costs, in an amount up to ten thousand ($10,000) dollars.Section 1813. False Signatures and Statements in Nomination Petitions and Papers.--If any person shall knowingly make a false statement in any affidavit or statement required by the provisions of this act, to be appended to or to accompany a nomination petition or a nomination paper, or if any person shall fraudulently sign any name not his own to any nomination petition or nomination paper, or if any person shall fraudulently alter any nomination petition or nomination paper without the consent of the signers, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred ($500) dollars, or to undergo imprisonment of not more than one (1) year, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1278PN1433 - 12 - 1234567891011121314151617